Utah statutes.
77-38-14.   Notice of expungement petition -- Victim's right to object.

(1)  The Department of Corrections or the Juvenile Probation Department shall prepare a document explaining the right of a victim or a victim's representative to object to a petition for expungement under Section 77-40-107 or 78A-6-1105 and the procedures for obtaining notice of any such petition.  The department or division shall also provide each trial court a copy of the document which has jurisdiction over delinquencies or criminal offenses subject to expungement.

(2)  The prosecuting attorney in any case leading to a conviction or an adjudication subject to expungement shall provide a copy of the document to each person who would be entitled to notice of a petition for expungement under Sections 77-40-107 and 78A-6-1105.



Amended by Chapter 283, 2010 General Session

